North Carolina statutes. Chapter 36A. Trusts and Trustees.
Article 14. Honorary Trusts; Trusts for Pets; Trusts for Cemetery Lots. [Repealed]

§§ 36A-145 through 36A-148.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2005-192, s. 1, effective January 1, 2006.

Editor’s Note.

Prior to repeal of this Chapter, G.S. 36A-149 through 36A-160 had been set out as reserved for future codification purposes.